Nevada, session 83, AB4.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 176.0931 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
176.0931 1. If a defendant is convicted of a sexual offense,
the court shall include in sentencing, in addition to any other
penalties provided by law, a special sentence of lifetime supervision.
2. The special sentence of lifetime supervision commences
after any period of probation or any term of imprisonment and any
period of release on parole.
3. A person sentenced to lifetime supervision may petition the
sentencing court or the State Board of Parole Commissioners for
release from lifetime supervision. The sentencing court or the Board
shall grant a petition for release from a special sentence of lifetime
supervision if:
(a) The person has complied with the requirements of the
provisions of NRS 179D.010 to 179D.550, inclusive;
(b) The person has not been convicted of an offense that poses a
threat to the safety or well-being of others for an interval of at least
10 consecutive years after the person’s last conviction or release
from incarceration, whichever occurs later; and
(c) The person is not likely to pose a threat to the safety of
others, as determined by a licensed, clinical professional who has
received training in the treatment of sexual offenders, if released
from lifetime supervision.
4. The Division may petition the sentencing court or the State
Board of Parole Commissioners for the release of a person
-
*AB4*

– 3 –
sentenced to lifetime supervision. The sentencing court or the
Board may grant a petition for release from a special sentence of
lifetime supervision if the person who is the subject of the petition
has not been convicted of an offense that poses a threat to the
safety or well-being of others for at least 20 consecutive years after
the person’s last conviction or release from incarceration,
whichever occurs later.
5. A person who is released from lifetime supervision pursuant
to the provisions of [subsection 3] this section remains subject to
the provisions for registration as a sex offender and to the provisions
for community notification, unless the person is otherwise relieved
from the operation of those provisions pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 179D.010 to 179D.550, inclusive.
[5.] 6. As used in this section:
(a) “Offense that poses a threat to the safety or well-being of
others” includes, without limitation:
(1) An offense that involves:
(I) A victim less than 18 years of age;
(II) A crime against a child as defined in
NRS 179D.0357;
(III) A sexual offense as defined in NRS 179D.097;
(IV) A deadly weapon, explosives or a firearm;
(V) The use or threatened use of force or violence;
(VI) Physical or mental abuse;
(VII) Death or bodily injury;
(VIII) An act of domestic violence;
(IX) Harassment, stalking, threats of any kind or other
similar acts;
(X) The forcible or unlawful entry of a home, building,
structure, vehicle or other real or personal property; or
(XI) The infliction or threatened infliction of damage or
injury, in whole or in part, to real or personal property.
(2) Any offense listed in subparagraph (1) that is committed
in this State or another jurisdiction, including, without limitation, an
offense prosecuted in:
(I) A tribal court.
(II) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of
the United States.
(b) “Sexual offense” means:
(1) A violation of NRS 200.366, subsection 4 of NRS
200.400, NRS 200.710, 200.720, subsection 2 of NRS 200.730,
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 200.975, NRS 201.180,
201.230, 201.450, 201.540 or 201.550 or paragraph (a) or (b) of
subsection 4 or paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 5 of NRS 201.560;
-
*AB4*

– 4 –
(2) An attempt to commit an offense listed in subparagraph
(1); or
(3) An act of murder in the first or second degree,
kidnapping in the first or second degree, false imprisonment,
burglary or invasion of the home if the act is determined to be
sexually motivated at a hearing conducted pursuant to NRS 175.547.
Sec. 2. NRS 176A.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.500 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the period of probation or suspension of sentence may be
indeterminate or may be fixed by the court and may at any time be
extended or terminated by the court, but the period, including any
extensions thereof, must not be more than:
(a) Twelve months for a:
(1) Gross misdemeanor; or
(2) Suspension of sentence pursuant to NRS 176A.240,
176A.260, 176A.290 or 453.3363;
(b) Eighteen months for a category E felony;
(c) Twenty-four months for a category C or D felony;
(d) Thirty-six months for a category B felony; or
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) to (d),
inclusive, 60 months for a violent or sexual offense as defined in
NRS 202.876, a violation of NRS 200.508 or a violation of NRS
574.100 that is punishable pursuant to subsection 6 of that section.
2. The court may extend the period of probation or suspension
of sentence ordered pursuant to subsection 1 for a period of not
more than 12 months if such an extension is necessary for the
defendant to complete his or her participation in a specialty court
program.
3. At any time during probation or suspension of sentence, the
court may issue a warrant for violating any of the conditions of
probation or suspension of sentence and cause the defendant to be
arrested. Except for the purpose of giving a dishonorable discharge
from probation, and except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the time during which a warrant for violating any of the conditions
of probation is in effect is not part of the period of probation. If the
warrant is cancelled or probation is reinstated, the court may include
any amount of that time as part of the period of probation.
4. Any parole and probation officer or any peace officer with
power to arrest may arrest a probationer without a warrant, or may
deputize any other officer with power to arrest to do so by giving the
probationer a written statement setting forth that the probationer has,
in the judgment of the parole and probation officer, violated the
conditions of probation. Except as otherwise provided in subsection
5, the parole and probation officer or the peace officer, after making
an arrest, shall present to the detaining authorities, if any, a
-
*AB4*

– 5 –
statement of the charges against the probationer. The parole and
probation officer shall at once notify the court which granted
probation of the arrest and detention or residential confinement of
the probationer and shall submit a report in writing showing in what
manner the probationer has violated the conditions of probation.
5. A parole and probation officer or a peace officer may
immediately release from custody without any further proceedings
any person the officer arrests without a warrant for violating a
condition of probation if the parole and probation officer or peace
officer determines that there is no probable cause to believe that the
person violated the condition of probation.
6. [A] Regardless of whether the period of probation ordered
pursuant to subsection 1 is indeterminate or fixed by the court, a
person who is sentenced to serve a period of probation for a felony
or a gross misdemeanor must be allowed for the period of the
probation a deduction of:
(a) Ten days from that period for each month the person serves
and is current with any fee to defray the costs of his or her
supervision charged by the Division of Parole and Probation of the
Department of Public Safety pursuant to NRS 213.1076 and with
any payment of restitution ordered by the court, including, without
limitation, any payment of restitution required pursuant to NRS
176A.430. A person shall be deemed to be current with any such fee
and payment of restitution for any given month if, during that
month, the person makes at least the minimum monthly payment
established by the court or, if the court does not establish a
minimum monthly payment, by the Division.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, 10 days from
that period for each month the person serves and is actively involved
in employment or enrolled in a program of education, rehabilitation
or any other program approved by the Division.
7. A person must be allowed a deduction pursuant to paragraph
(a) or (b) of subsection 6 regardless of whether the person has
satisfied the requirements of the other paragraph and must be
allowed a deduction pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection
6 if the person has satisfied the requirements of both paragraphs of
that subsection.
8. A person who is sentenced to serve a period of probation for
a felony or a gross misdemeanor and who is a participant in a
specialty court program must be allowed a deduction from the
period of probation for being actively involved in employment or
enrolled in a program of education, rehabilitation or any other
program approved by the Division only if the person successfully
completes the specialty court program. Such a deduction must not
-
*AB4*

– 6 –
exceed the length of time remaining on the person’s period of
probation.
Sec. 3. NRS 213.1243 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.1243 1. The Board shall establish by regulation a
program of lifetime supervision of sex offenders to commence after
any period of probation or any term of imprisonment and any period
of release on parole. The program must provide for the lifetime
supervision of sex offenders by parole and probation officers.
2. Lifetime supervision shall be deemed a form of parole for:
(a) The limited purposes of the applicability of the provisions of
NRS 213.1076, subsection 9 of NRS 213.1095, NRS 213.1096 and
subsection 2 of NRS 213.110; and
(b) The purposes of the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender
Supervision ratified, enacted and entered into by the State of Nevada
pursuant to NRS 213.215.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, the Board
shall require as a condition of lifetime supervision that the sex
offender reside at a location only if:
(a) The residence has been approved by the parole and probation
officer assigned to the person.
(b) If the residence is a facility that houses more than three
persons who have been released from prison, the facility is a facility
for transitional living for released offenders that is licensed pursuant
to chapter 449 of NRS.
(c) The person keeps the parole and probation officer informed
of his or her current address.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, the Board
shall require as a condition of lifetime supervision that the sex
offender, unless approved by the parole and probation officer
assigned to the sex offender and by a psychiatrist, psychologist or
counselor treating the sex offender, if any, not knowingly be within
500 feet of any place, or if the place is a structure, within 500 feet of
the actual structure, that is designed primarily for use by or for
children, including, without limitation, a public or private school, a
school bus stop, a center or facility that provides day care services, a
video arcade, an amusement park, a playground, a park, an athletic
field or a facility for youth sports, or a motion picture theater. The
provisions of this subsection apply only to a sex offender who is a
Tier 3 offender.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, if a sex
offender is convicted of a sexual offense listed in subsection 6 of
NRS 213.1255 against a child under the age of 14 years, the sex
offender is a Tier 3 offender and the sex offender is sentenced to
lifetime supervision, the Board shall require as a condition of
lifetime supervision that the sex offender:
-
*AB4*

– 7 –
(a) Reside at a location only if the residence is not located
within 1,000 feet of any place, or if the place is a structure, within
1,000 feet of the actual structure, that is designed primarily for use
by or for children, including, without limitation, a public or private
school, a school bus stop, a center or facility that provides day care
services, a video arcade, an amusement park, a playground, a park,
an athletic field or a facility for youth sports, or a motion picture
theater.
(b) As deemed appropriate by the Chief, be placed under a
system of active electronic monitoring that is capable of identifying
his or her location and producing, upon request, reports or records of
his or her presence near or within a crime scene or prohibited area
or his or her departure from a specified geographic location.
(c) Pay any costs associated with his or her participation under
the system of active electronic monitoring, to the extent of his or her
ability to pay.
6. A sex offender placed under the system of active electronic
monitoring pursuant to subsection 5 shall:
(a) Follow the instructions provided by the Division to maintain
the electronic monitoring device in working order.
(b) Report any incidental damage or defacement of the
electronic monitoring device to the Division within 2 hours after the
occurrence of the damage or defacement.
(c) Abide by any other conditions set forth by the Division with
regard to his or her participation under the system of active
electronic monitoring.
7. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person
who intentionally removes or disables or attempts to remove or
disable an electronic monitoring device placed on a sex offender
pursuant to this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The
provisions of this subsection do not prohibit a person authorized by
the Division from performing maintenance or repairs to an
electronic monitoring device.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, a sex offender
who commits a violation of a condition imposed on him or her
pursuant to the program of lifetime supervision is guilty of a
category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 6 years, and may be further
punished by a fine of not more than $5,000.
9. The Board is not required to impose a condition pursuant to
the program of lifetime supervision listed in subsections 3, 4 and 5
if the Board finds that extraordinary circumstances are present and
the Board states those extraordinary circumstances in writing.
-
*AB4*

– 8 –
10. The Board shall require as a condition of lifetime
supervision that the sex offender not have contact or communicate
with a victim of the sexual offense or a witness who testified against
the sex offender or solicit another person to engage in such contact
or communication on behalf of the sex offender, unless approved by
the Chief or his or her designee and a written agreement is entered
into and signed.
11. The Board shall require as a condition of lifetime
supervision, in addition to any other condition imposed pursuant to
this section, that the sex offender:
(a) Participate in and complete a program of professional
counseling approved by the Division, unless, before commencing a
program of lifetime supervision, the sex offender previously
completed a program of professional counseling recommended or
ordered by the Board or the court upon conviction of the sexual
offense for which the sex offender will be placed under a program
of lifetime supervision.
(b) Not use aliases or fictitious names.
(c) Not possess any sexually explicit material that is harmful to
minors as defined in NRS 201.257.
(d) Not enter, visit or patronize an establishment which offers a
sexually related form of entertainment as its primary business.
(e) Inform the parole and probation officer assigned to the sex
offender of any post office box used by the sex offender.
12. If the sex offender is convicted of a sexual offense
involving the use of the Internet, the Board shall require, in addition
to any other condition imposed pursuant to this section, that the sex
offender not possess any electronic device capable of accessing the
Internet and not access the Internet through any such device or any
other means, unless the sex offender installs a device or subscribes
to a service which enables the parole and probation officer assigned
to the sex offender to regulate the sex offender’s use of the Internet.
The provisions of this subsection do not apply to a device used by a
sex offender within the course and scope of his or her employment.
13. If the sex offender is convicted of a sexual offense
involving the use of alcohol, cannabis or a controlled substance, the
Board shall require, in addition to any other condition imposed
pursuant to this section, that the sex offender participate in and
complete a program of counseling pertaining to substance use
disorders approved by the Division, unless, before commencing a
program of lifetime supervision, the sex offender previously
completed a program of counseling pertaining to substance use
disorders recommended or ordered by the Board or the court upon
conviction of the sexual offense for which the sex offender will be
placed under a program of lifetime supervision.
-
*AB4*

– 9 –
14. If a court issues a warrant for arrest for a violation of this
section, the court shall cause to be transmitted, in the manner
prescribed by the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History, notice of the issuance of the warrant for arrest in a
manner which ensures that such notice is received by the Central
Repository within 3 business days.
15. For the purposes of prosecution of a violation by a sex
offender of a condition imposed upon him or her pursuant to the
program of lifetime supervision:
(a) In which the violation occurred outside this State, the
violation shall be deemed to have occurred in, and may only be
prosecuted in, the county in which the court that imposed the
sentence of lifetime supervision pursuant to NRS 176.0931 is
located, regardless of whether the acts or conduct constituting the
violation took place, in whole or in part, outside that county or
outside this State; or
(b) In which the violation occurred within this State, the
violation shall be deemed to have occurred in, and may only be
prosecuted in, the county in which the violation occurred.
16. As used in this section, “sex offender” means any person
who has been convicted of a sexual offense as defined in paragraph
(b) of subsection [5] 6 of NRS 176.0931.
Sec. 4. The amendatory provisions of:
1. Section 1 of this act apply to a person who is sentenced to a
program of lifetime supervision before, on or after October 1, 2025.
2. Section 2 of this act apply to a person who is sentenced to
serve a period of probation before, on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB4*